Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-414
City council; departments; assignment of duties.

The executive and administrative powers, authorities, and duties in cities adopting the commission plan of government shall be distributed into and among departments as follows:

In cities of the metropolitan class, (1) finance, (2) fire, (3) human resources, (4) human rights and relations, (5) law, (6) parks, recreation, and public property, (7) planning, (8) police, and (9) public works;

In cities of the primary class, (1) department of public affairs, (2) department of accounts and finances, (3) department of public safety, (4) department of streets and public improvements, and (5) department of parks and public property; and

In cities containing two thousand or more and not more than forty thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census, (1) department of public affairs and public safety, (2) department of accounts and finances, (3) department of streets, public improvements, and public property, (4) department of public works, and (5) department of parks and recreation.

The city council shall provide, as nearly as possible, the powers and duties to be exercised and performed by, and assign them to, the appropriate departments. The city council may prescribe the powers and duties of all officers and employees of the city and may assign particular officers, or employees, to more than one of the departments, may require any officer or employee to perform duties in two or more of the departments, and may make such other rules and regulations as may be necessary or proper for the efficient and economical management of the business affairs of the city.

Laws 1911, c. 24, § 11, p. 159;

Laws 1913, c. 21, § 7, p. 92;

R.S.1913, § 5298;

C.S.1922, § 4521;

Laws 1923, c. 141, § 7, p. 351;

C.S.1929, § 19-411;

R.S.1943, § 19-414;

Laws 1955, c. 55, § 3, p. 179;

Laws 1979, LB 281, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 24;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 328.
July 21, 2022
The general plan of the commission form of government has been followed in Lincoln under the home rule charter. Eppley Hotels Co. v. City of Lincoln, 133 Neb. 550, 276 N.W. 196 (1937).

The fact that an officer had been in the habit of employing men in the past does not override the provision of the statute unless it had previously been agreed to by the city commissioner. Scott v. City of Lincoln, 104 Neb. 546, 178 N.W. 203 (1920).

The power to fix salaries of police officers and members of the fire department in cities of the metropolitan class was not included in this section. Adams v. City of Omaha, 101 Neb. 690, 164 N.W. 714 (1917).